New York, session 2025-2026, S5907.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 252 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 (3) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this 4 section, the governing body of any municipality acting through its local 5 legislative body or other governing agency, is hereby authorized and 6 empowered to adopt and amend local laws or ordinances to exempt from the 7 taxes imposed by this article the mortgage of residential real property, 8 when such real property is purchased and is to be occupied by an owner 9 or owners who have received, or for whom a final determination has been 10 made and will receive, federally and/or state funded buyouts of such 11 owner or owners' previous residential real property which was damaged or 12 destroyed as a result of hurricane Sandy during October of two thousand 13 twelve. 14 (b) Any person who after October twenty-second, two thousand twelve 15 and before the effective date of this subdivision, who would otherwise 16 qualify under paragraph (a) of this subdivision, and who has paid any 17 taxes imposed by this article, shall be entitled to receive a reimburse- 18 ment of all such taxes paid from the county clerk or county treasurer of 19 the respective county where such taxes were paid in the same manner as 20 provided in section two hundred fifty-seven-a of this article. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10037-01-5 S. 5907 2 1 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 2 the provisions of this act and all local laws and ordinances adopted 3 pursuant to its authority shall expire and be deemed repealed on and 4 after January 1, 2028.